Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 305.380 is amended to read:
305.380. As used in this section and  ORS 305.385:
(1) “Agency” means any  department, board, commission, division or authority of the State of
Oregon, or any political subdivision of this state [ which] that imposes a local  tax administered by
the Department of Revenue under ORS 305.620.
(2) “License” means any written authority required by law or ordinance as a prerequisite to  the
conduct of a business, trade or profession.
(3) “Owner” means an owner, as defined in ORS 60.470, that has at least a 20 percent
ownership interest of a provider.
[(3)] (4) “Provider” means any person who contracts to supply  goods, services or real estate
space to an agency.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a) “Tax” means state  taxes administered by the department under the tax laws of this
state and local taxes administered by the department under ORS 305.620 , and  any associated
penalties and interest imposed in addition to the tax .
(b) “Tax” does not include ad valorem property taxes collected by counties.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 305.385 is amended to read:
305.385. (1) Upon request of the Department of Revenue, an agency issuing or renewing a license
to conduct a business, trade or  profession shall annually, on or before March 1, supply the depart-
ment with a list of specified licenses issued or renewed by  the agency during the preceding calendar
year.
(2) Upon request of the department, an agency shall annually, on  or before March 1, supply the
department with a list of specified persons contracting  with the agency to provide goods, services
or real estate space to the agency during the preceding calendar year.
(3) The lists required by subsections (1) and (2) of this  section shall contain the name, address,
Social  Security  or federal employer identification number of each licensee or provider or such other
information as the department may by rule require.
(4)(a) If the department determines that any licensee or provider has neglected or refused  to file
any return or to pay any tax  and that such person has not filed in good faith a petition before the
department contesting the tax, and the department has been unable to  obtain payment of the tax
through other methods  of collection, the Director of the Department of Revenue may,
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-B) Page 1
notwithstanding ORS 118.525, 314.835 or 314.840 or any similar provision of law, notify the agency
and the person in writing.
(b) Upon receipt of such  notice, the agency shall refuse to reissue, renew or extend any license,
contract or agreement until the agency receives a certificate issued by the department that  the
person is in good standing with respect to any returns due and taxes payable to  the department as
of the date of the certificate.
(c) Upon the written request of the director and after  a hearing and notice to the licensee as
required under any applicable provision of law, the agency shall suspend the person’s license if the
agency finds that the returns and taxes  have not been filed or paid and that the licensee has not
filed in good faith a petition before the department contesting the tax and  the department has been
unable to obtain payment of the tax through other methods of collection. For  the purpose of the
agency’s findings, the written representation to that effect by the department  to the agency shall
constitute prima facie evidence of the person’s failure to file returns or pay  the tax. The department
shall have the right to intervene in any license suspension proceeding.
(d) Any license suspended  under this subsection [ shall] may not be reissued or renewed until
the agency receives a certificate issued by the department that the  licensee is in good standing with
respect to any returns due and taxes payable to the department as of the date of the certificate.
(5) The department may enter into an  installment payment agreement with a licensee or pro-
vider with respect to any unpaid tax, penalty and interest.  The agreement shall provide for interest
on the outstanding amount at  the rate prescribed by ORS 305.220. The department may issue a
provisional certificate of good standing pursuant to subsection (4)(b) and (d) of this section which
shall remain in effect  so long as the licensee or provider fully complies with the terms of the in-
stallment agreement. Failure by the  licensee or provider to fully comply with the terms of the in-
stallment agreement shall render the agreement and the provisional  certificate of good standing null
and void, unless the  department determines that the failure was due to reasonable cause. If the de-
partment determines that the failure was not due to reasonable  cause, the total amount of the tax,
penalty and interest shall be immediately due and payable, and the department shall  notify any af-
fected agency that the licensee or provider is not in good standing. The agency  shall then take ap-
propriate action under subsection (4)(b) and (d) of this section.
[(6) No contract or other agreement  for the purpose of providing goods, services or real estate space
to any agency  shall be entered into, renewed or extended with any person, unless the person certifies
in writing, under penalty of perjury, that the person  is, to the best of the person’s knowledge, not in
violation of any tax laws described in ORS 305.380 (4). ]
(6) A contract or other agreement for the purpose  of providing goods, services or real
estate space to any agency,  other than a political subdivision of this state, may not be en-
tered into, renewed  or extended with any provider or owner, unless at the time of contract-
ing with an agency:
(a) The provider and owner certify in writing,  under penalty of perjury, that to the best
of the person’s knowledge the  provider or owner is not in violation of any tax laws described
in ORS 305.380; and
(b) The provider and each owner submit certificates issued by  the department stating
that, as of the date of the certificate, the provider or owner is  not in violation of any tax
laws described in ORS 305.380.
(7) The [ certification] certificate under subsection (6) of this section shall  be required for each
contract , [ and] renewal or extension of a contract [ or may be provided on an  annual basis ] and in-
crease in contract value and must be dated no earlier than six months prior to the date that
the provider contracts with the agency . A [ certification shall not be ] certificate is  not required
for a contract if the consideration for  the goods, services or real estate space provided under the
contract is no more than [ $1,000] $250,000.
(8) A contract may not be executed if a certificate as described in  subsection (6) of this
section is not provided to the agency.
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-B) Page 2
(9) Upon request of a  provider, if the provider and each owner are not in violation of any
tax laws described in ORS 305.380, the department shall, within 14 days after the request,
issue to the provider and each  owner a certificate as described in subsection (6) of this sec-
tion.
[(8)(a)] (10)(a) The requirements of the  [ certification] certificate  under subsection (6) of this
section shall be subject to the rules adopted by the department in accordance with this section.
(b) The department may by rule exempt  certain contracts from the requirements of subsection
(6) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 279B.110 is amended to read:
279B.110. (1) As part of a contracting agency’s  evaluation of a bid or proposal, the contracting
agency shall determine whether the bidder or proposer is responsible  in accordance with the
standards of responsibility set forth in subsection (2) of  this section. If the contracting agency de-
termines that a bidder or proposer is not responsible, the contracting agency  shall provide the bid-
der or proposer with written notice of the contracting agency’s determination.
(2) In order for  a contracting agency to determine that a bidder or proposer is responsible, the
bidder or proposer must demonstrate to the contracting agency that the bidder or proposer:
(a) Has available the appropriate financial, material, equipment,  facility and personnel resources
and expertise, or has the ability  to obtain the resources and expertise, necessary to meet all con-
tractual responsibilities.
(b) Completed previous contracts  of a similar nature with a satisfactory record of performance.
For purposes of this paragraph, a satisfactory record of  performance means that to the extent that
the costs  associated with and time available to perform a previous contract remained within the
bidder’s or proposer’s control, the bidder or  proposer stayed within the time and budget allotted for
the procurement and  otherwise performed the contract in a satisfactory manner. The contracting
agency shall document  the bidder’s or proposer’s record of performance if the contracting agency
finds under this paragraph that the bidder or proposer is not responsible.
(c) Has a satisfactory record  of integrity. The contracting agency in evaluating the bidder’s or
proposer’s record of integrity may consider, among other things, whether the bidder or  proposer has
previous criminal convictions for offenses related to obtaining  or attempting to obtain a contract
or subcontract  or in connection with the bidder’s or proposer’s performance of a contract or sub-
contract. The contracting agency shall document the bidder’s or proposer’s record of integrity if  the
contracting agency finds under this paragraph that the bidder or proposer is not responsible.
(d) Is legally qualified to contract with the contracting agency.
[(e) Complied with the tax laws of the state or a political subdivision  of the state, including ORS
305.620 and ORS chapters 316, 317 and 318. The bidder or proposer  shall demonstrate compliance by
attesting to the bidder’s or proposer’s compliance in any way  the contracting agency deems credible
and convenient.]
(e) Is not in violation of any  tax laws described in ORS 305.380. If the anticipated price
of a public contract that a contracting  agency awards or renews is $250,000 or less, the bid-
der or proposer shall demonstrate compliance by attesting to the bidder’s  or proposer’s
compliance in any  manner the contracting agency deems credible and convenient. If the an-
ticipated price of a public contract that a state contracting  agency awards or renews is more
than $250,000, the bidder or  proposer shall submit to the state contracting agency a certif-
icate from the Department of Revenue, as provided in ORS 305.385 (6).
(f) Possesses  an unexpired certificate that the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
issued under ORS 279A.167 if the bidder or proposer  employs 50 or more full-time workers and
submitted a bid or proposal for a procurement with an estimated contract price  that exceeds
$500,000 in response to an advertisement or solicitation from a state contracting agency.
(g) Supplied all necessary information in connection  with the inquiry concerning responsibility.
If a bidder or proposer fails to promptly supply information concerning  responsibility that the con-
tracting agency requests, the contracting  agency shall determine the bidder’s or proposer’s respon-
sibility based on available information or may find that the bidder or proposer is not responsible.
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-B) Page 3
(h) Was not debarred by the contracting agency under ORS 279B.130.
(3) A contracting agency  may refuse to disclose outside of the contracting agency confidential
information furnished by a bidder or proposer under  this section when the bidder or proposer has
clearly identified in writing  the information the bidder or proposer seeks to have treated as confi-
dential and the contracting agency has authority under ORS  192.311 to 192.478 to withhold the
identified information from disclosure.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS  279B.110, 305.380 and 305.385 by sections 1 to 3 of
this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. (1) The Secretary of  State shall study methods for ensuring that information
collected by the Corporation Division of the Office of the Secretary  of State in its business
registry function from persons doing  business in this state is collected and retained in a
manner most effective to ensure compliance with the tax laws of this  state by those that are
doing business in this state. This information includes names and addresses of persons doing
business in this state.
(2) In the study required under this section, the secretary shall review methods to:
(a) Ensure that all business owners are properly registered.
(b) Verify that provided physical addresses of business owners are accurate.
(c) Use technology to detect variations in provided names and addresses and other data
and multiple uses of addresses.
(d) Expand the authority of  the secretary to review and investigate applications for reg-
istration.
(e) Ensure appropriate enforcement and penalties for  failure to provide current, accurate
or valid information.
(3) In the study required under this section, the secretary shall assess  whether the cur-
rent statutes and rules applicable to the secretary’s business registry functions and  current
division capacity are sufficient to ensure a business registry  that is reliable and current and
has sufficient information to be useful for purposes of state agencies or  consumers seeking
to verify information about businesses operating in this state.
(4) The secretary shall consult with the Department of Revenue, the  Department of
Justice and the Legislative Revenue Officer  in the preparation of the study and reports re-
quired under this section.
(5) The secretary shall submit reports on the findings of the study required under  this
section, in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for leg-
islation, to the interim or regular committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue.
The secretary shall submit a preliminary report no  later than December 31, 2026, and a final
report no later than the conclusion of the 2027 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3), chapter 553,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Personal Tax  and Compliance Division, is increased
by $262,503, for the purpose of carrying out section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 553, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
553, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the  Personal
Tax and Compliance Division, is increased by $6,358, for  the purpose of carrying out section
2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (4), chapter 553,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-B) Page 4
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Business Division, is  increased by $41,928, for the
purpose of carrying out section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 553, Oregon Laws 2025, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
553, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Department of Revenue,  for the Business
Division, is increased by $42,626, for the purpose of carrying out section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (5), chapter 553,  Oregon Laws 2025, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the Collections Division, is increased by $44,417, for the
purpose of carrying out section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 553, Oregon Laws 2025, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
553, Oregon Laws 2025, collected or received by the Department of  Revenue, for the Col-
lections Division, is increased by $25,721, for the purpose of carrying out section 2 of this 2026
Act.
SECTION 13.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-B) Page 5